Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.32.010

Homicide defined.

Homicide is the killing of a human being by the act, procurement, or omission of another, death occurring at any time, and is either (1) murder, (2) homicide by abuse, (3) manslaughter, (4) excusable homicide, or (5) justifiable homicide.

[ 1997 c 196 s 3; 1987 c 187 s 2; 1983 c 10 s 1; 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.32.010.]

NOTES:

Excusable homicide: RCW 9A.16.030.

Justifiable homicide: RCW 9A.16.040 and 9A.16.050.